Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
First alternate members of the Legislative Council shall have a vote in matters before the Legislative Council if the regular member which the first alternate represents is not in attendance.

First alternate members attending as nonvoting members of the Legislative Council shall receive per diem and mileage to be paid in the same manner and from the same source as regular members of the Legislative Council.

Second alternate members of the Legislative Council shall have a vote in matters before the Legislative Council if the regular member and the first alternate member which the second alternate represents are not in attendance.

In the event of a tie vote in the congressional caucus to elect members and alternates, the member or alternate shall be elected by the entire membership of the House or Senate, as the case may be.

Following the selection by caucus of the regular and alternate Senate members of the Legislative Council from the respective congressional districts, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint from the membership of the Senate his or her first and second alternate members.

The designation of first and second alternate members by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall be made prior to adjournment of each regular session of the General Assembly.

The selection and designation of first and second alternate members from the membership of the House shall be in accordance with the procedure prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, after January 1, 1999, the selection and designation of first and second alternate members from the membership of the Senate shall be in accordance with the procedure prescribed by the Rules of the Senate.

The names of the persons shall be entered upon the journal of the respective houses.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, tenure of membership and the means of filling vacant positions for Senate Legislative Council members shall be as prescribed by the Rules of the Senate.

Tenure of membership and means of filling vacant positions for House Legislative Council members shall be as prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives.

The cochairs of the Joint Budget Committee shall be ex officio voting members of the Legislative Council.

The House Chair of the Joint Budget Committee may designate the House Vice Chair of the Joint Budget Committee and other House chairs of Joint Budget Committee subcommittees as ex officio nonvoting members of the Legislative Council, thereby authorizing their attendance at meetings of the Legislative Council and its subcommittees.

The House chairs and vice chairs of the Review/PEER Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee, the Personnel Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee, and the Claims Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee shall serve on the corresponding subcommittees of the Legislative Council as ex officio nonvoting members.

With the consent of both the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Legislative Council may meet during a session of the General Assembly to transact business concerning the personnel and operations of the Bureau of Legislative Research.

This subsection does not limit the authority of the Legislative Council to meet during a recess as authorized by § 10-3-211 or § 10-2-223.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As originally amended by Acts 2001, No. 148, subdivision (e)(1) provided:

“Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, after January 1, 1999, tenure of membership and the means of filling vacant positions for Senate Legislative Council Members shall be as prescribed by Senate Rules.”

Acts 2003, No. 1091, Section 5 was mislabeled as Section 3.

Acts 2003, No. 1792, provided in subdivision (b)(2)(G):

“Conduct a cost study on or before August 31, 2004, to be submitted to the Arkansas Legislative Council for the purpose of determining whether legislation should be proposed to adjust the commercial mobile radio service emergency service charges to reflect the actual and reasonable costs to be appropriately incurred by public safety answering points and commercial mobile radio service providers for compliance with applicable requirements of the Federal Communications Commission docket # 94-102.”

Amendments. The 2007 amendment by No. 319 added (h).

The 2007 amendment by 321 added (a)(3)(B)(vii) and (viii).

The Senate members of the Legislative Council shall select one (1) of their number as Legislative Council cochair and one (1) of their number as Legislative Council co-vice chair.

(A)The House cochair shall appoint all House Legislative Council members to Legislative Council subcommittees and the Senate cochair shall appoint all Senate Legislative Council members of Legislative Council subcommittees.

The House cochair shall appoint a House Legislative Council member as cochair of each Legislative Council subcommittee and the Senate cochair shall appoint a Senate Legislative Council member as cochair of each Legislative Council subcommittee.

The Senate cochair and the House cochair shall alternate in presiding at meetings of the Legislative Council unless the two (2) chairs shall agree otherwise.

Any other officers shall be elected as the Legislative Council may deem necessary.

The Legislative Council shall select an executive secretary who shall serve as secretary to the Legislative Council at all of its meetings, but without a vote.

The bureau shall cooperate with comparable legislative agencies in other states concerning the availability and exchange of publications in order that the General Assembly might be fully advised of current developments in the legislatures of the various states.

The bureau shall maintain files or digital copies of bills introduced at the various legislative sessions that may or may not have been enacted by the General Assembly;

Prepare research reports and provide other staff services to the Legislative Council or its subcommittees with respect to studies undertaken by the Legislative Council at the direction of the General Assembly, or either house thereof, or upon request of any member of the General Assembly;

Assist the Legislative Council in its study of the budgetary and fiscal needs of the various state agencies and cooperate with the Department of Finance and Administration and other agencies of this state upon direction of the Legislative Council in the preparation of a budget manual reflecting the Legislative Council's budgetary recommendations to each session of the General Assembly;

Cooperate with comparable legislative service agencies in other states by exchanging information of legislative interest and participate in conferences or workshops on a regional or national basis organized for the purpose of exchanging information or discussing means and methods of improving services to legislatures and legislators in connection with the performance of their official duties; and

Perform any other duties and assignments as may be directed by the Legislative Council or by the General Assembly.

Taking actions regarding establishing new, repealing, or changing personnel policies pertaining to employees of the bureau;

Taking actions concerning the hiring or termination of staff, staff promotions, and proposed salary changes.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an employment contract, any salary obligation, other obligation, or change in employment status of staff of the bureau from an at-will employment relationship; or

Establishing new, repealing, or changing any other policies or procedures of the bureau relating to the delivery of services and other matters pertaining to the operation of the bureau, including the annual budget request of the bureau.

The Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council may meet and transact business both during a session of the General Assembly and during the interim between sessions of the General Assembly. If during a legislative session the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council takes action that requires approval by the Legislative Council, the approval may be granted either by the Legislative Council, if authorized to meet, or by the Joint Budget Committee.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment by No. 18 substituted “under the direction of the cochairs of the Legislative Council” for “who shall be assisted by the Dean of the School of Law of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville” in (d).

The 2007 amendment by No. 319, in (g), added (2), substituted “The Executive Subcommittee may require the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research to report” for “The Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall report to” in present (1), and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendment by No. 665 rewrote (c)(4).

The 2009 amendment inserted “session, fiscal session”following “regular” in (c)(2).

The 2015 amendment substituted “annual” for “biennial” in (g)(1)(C).

The 2017 amendment added (h).

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added the subdivision designations in (a); inserted “sessions, fiscal sessions”following “regular” in (a)(1); deleted “thereof” preceding “shall be given” in (a)(2); substituted “of the General Assembly” for “thereof” in the first sentence of (b); and inserted “session, fiscal session” following “regular” in (c).

Ark. L. Rev.

Watkins, Access to Public Records under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act, 37 Ark. L. Rev. 741.

Watkins, Open Meetings under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act, 38 Ark. L. Rev. 268.

(1)The bureau may employ outside legal counsel as deemed necessary by the director after receiving prior approval of the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

(1)The Legislative Council shall convene at any time during the interim between regular sessions, fiscal sessions, or special sessions of the General Assembly and shall remain in session for such time as it considers necessary for the consideration of all matters relating to state government, not however, for more than a total of ninety (90) days which need not be continuous.

The Legislative Council shall undertake such studies or investigations as may be directed by the General Assembly or either house of the General Assembly. In addition, any member of the General Assembly shall be privileged when the General Assembly is not in session to submit resolutions or study proposals to the Legislative Council for its consideration, study, and recommendations.

The Legislative Council shall report any findings and recommendations to each regular session, fiscal session, or special session of the General Assembly for the repeal or amendment of existing laws or for the enactment of new laws with respect to the operation of the state government or with respect to any matter that is a subject for legislative consideration.

All departments and agencies of the state government are directed to cooperate with the Legislative Council and with the Bureau of Legislative Research in providing assistance, information, or data when requested so that the General Assembly might be fully advised of all matters with respect to the operation of the various state agencies, departments, and institutions.

Hearings before the Legislative Council shall be public, and all sessions of the Legislative Council shall be open to the public, except in those instances in which the Legislative Council feels that it is necessary to go into executive session.

All records, reports, and other matters before the committee or in the office of the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall at all times during business hours be open to reasonable public inspection, except as to those matters which the Legislative Council has determined should be privileged.

Any member of the General Assembly or other person can be heard by the Legislative Council for the purpose of discussing any proposed legislation or any other matter of public interest.

The Rules of the House of Representatives and the Rules of the Senate shall govern the proceedings of the Legislative Council, but if the rules are conflicting or inadequate, the Legislative Council shall adopt its own rules.

The Legislative Council shall have authority to conduct investigations pertaining to the operation of any state agency, institution, department, or office.

After its organization, the Legislative Council shall proceed to investigate all state departments, agencies, institutions, and all other activities supported either in whole or in part by state funds.

In connection with any investigation, it shall have the right and power to subpoena witnesses and to issue subpoena duces tecum. The cochairs of the Legislative Council are authorized to administer oaths.

The Legislative Council shall make proper recommendations to each General Assembly as to the appropriations required by all agencies, institutions, and departments for their efficient and economical operation.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 738, § 1; 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 14; 2019, No. 910, § 3372.